Missouri, session 2026, HCR28.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
WHEREAS, according to the American Society for Reproductive Medicine,
infertility is defined as a disease, condition, or status characterized by the inability to
achieve a successful pregnancy based on a patient's medical, sexual, and reproductive history,
age, physical findings, diagnostic testing, or any combination thereof; the need for medical
intervention to achieve a successful pregnancy either as an individual or with a partner; or the
inability to conceive or sustain a successful pregnancy after 12 months of regular, unprotected
sexual intercourse for women under 35 years of age, or 6 months for women 35 years and
older; and affects millions of individuals and couples worldwide; and

WHEREAS, it is estimated that approximately 1 in 6 couples in the United States
experiences infertility, affecting men and women equally; and

WHEREAS, the emotional, physical, and financial toll of infertility can significantly
affect the mental health and well-being of individuals and families; and

WHEREAS, raising awareness about infertility helps to reduce stigma, foster
understanding, and promote equitable access to fertility treatments and family-building
options; and

WHEREAS, research and education on infertility, as well as advances in medical
treatment, remain critical to supporting individuals and couples facing infertility; and


HCR 28 2
WHEREAS, organizations both locally and nationally play a vital role in advocating
for those affected by infertility and in providing resources and support; and

WHEREAS, recognizing the last full week in April as Infertility Awareness Week
provides an opportunity to educate the public, support those navigating infertility, and
encourage policymakers to address barriers to care and treatment:

NOW THEREFORE BE IT RESOLVED that the members of the House of
Representatives of the One Hundred Third General Assembly, Second Regular Session, the
Senate concurring therein, hereby designate the last full week of April each year as Infertility
Awareness Week to increase understanding, provide support, and emphasize the importance
of access to care for all affected individuals and families; and

BE IT FURTHER RESOLVED that this resolution be sent to the Governor for his
approval or rejection pursuant to the Missouri Constitution.
✔